dictsource/xpq_rules
// Translation rules for Mohegan
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.group a
            a      a

.group á
            á      a:
            áw     au
            áy     ai

.group i
            i      i

.group o
            o      o

.group ô
            ô      o:

.group u
            u      u

.group c
            c      k
            ch     tS

.group h
            h      h

.group k
            k      k

.group l
            l      l

.group m
            m      m

.group n
            n      n

.group p
            p      p

.group q
            q      kw
            q (_   k

.group s
            s      s
            sh     S

.group t
            t      t

.group w
            w      w

.group y
            y      j

.group z
            z      dZ
